Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-441
Inspection by State Fire Marshal; fee.

The department may request the State Fire Marshal to inspect any applicant for licensure or any licensee for fire safety pursuant to section 81-502. The State Fire Marshal shall assess a fee for such inspection pursuant to section 81-505.01 payable by such applicant or licensee. The State Fire Marshal may delegate such authority to make such inspections to qualified local fire prevention personnel pursuant to section 81-502.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 41.